Maine, session 132, LD78.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4711, as amended by PL 2021, c. 190, §1, is further amended
by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
Beginning July 1, 2026, the parameters for essential instruction and graduation
requirements adopted by the department pursuant to section 6209 for English language arts
must provide for regular instruction in and opportunities to use cursive handwriting
beginning no later than grade 3 and continuing to the end of grade 5. The instruction must
be designed to enable students to demonstrate competency in cursive handwriting by the
end of grade 5.